Maryland, session 2025, HB0417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 55. COMMISSION ON UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE.
13–5501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE COMMISSION ON UNIVERSAL
HEALTH CARE.
13–5502.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0417*

HOUSE BILL 417
(A) THERE IS A COMMISSION ON UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO DETERMINE THE FEASIBILITY
OF ESTABLISHING A STATE UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM TO PROVIDE
HEALTH BENEFITS TO ALL RESIDENTS OF THE STATE THROUGH A SINGLE–PAYER
SYSTEM.
(C) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF:
(1) THREE MEMBERS OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) THREE MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) THE SECRETARY OF LABOR, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE SPECIAL SECRETARY OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS, OR THE SPECIAL SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(8) THE COMMISSIONER OF THE MARYLAND INSURANCE
ADMINISTRATION, OR THE COMMISSIONER’S DESIGNEE;
(9) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF PUBLIC SECTOR LABOR UNIONS,
DESIGNATED BY THE MARYLAND STATE AND DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA AFL–CIO;
(10) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF PRIVATE SECTOR LABOR UNIONS,
DESIGNATED BY THE MARYLAND STATE AND DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA AFL–CIO;
AND
(11) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES, REPRESENTING THE GEOGRAPHIC AND POPULATION
DENSITY DIVERSITY OF THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 417 3
(II) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE MARYLAND MUNICIPAL
LEAGUE, REPRESENTING THE GEOGRAPHIC AND POPULATION DENSITY DIVERSITY
OF THE STATE;
(III) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE BUSINESS COMMUNITY,
AT LEAST ONE OF WHOM REPRESENTS SMALL BUSINESS;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF MEDCHI;
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE MARYLAND HOSPITAL
ASSOCIATION;
(VI) ONE LICENSED NURSE WHO PRACTICES IN THE STATE;
(VII) ONE LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER WHO PRACTICES IN THE
STATE;
(VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONGOVERNMENTAL
ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES HEALTH CARE AND SUPPORTIVE SERVICES TO
INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS IN THE STATE;
(IX) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONGOVERNMENTAL
ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES HEALTH CARE TO OR ASSISTS WITH OBTAINING
HEALTH CARE FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE UNINSURED, UNDERINSURED, OR
UNABLE TO OBTAIN INSURANCE;
(X) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A NONGOVERNMENTAL
ORGANIZATION THAT WORKS WITH FORMERLY INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS; AND
(XI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM AN ORGANIZATION THAT
ASSISTS IMMIGRANTS.
(D) THE GOVERNOR, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, SHALL DESIGNATE A CHAIR OF THE
COMMISSION.
(E) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, IN MAKING APPOINTMENTS TO THE
COMMISSION, THE GOVERNOR, THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, AND THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE SHALL ENSURE REGIONAL, ECONOMIC, ETHNIC, AND
GENDER DIVERSITY IN THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:

HOUSE BILL 417
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT OF EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES
JOINTLY SHALL PROVIDE STAFF TO SUPPORT THE COMMISSION.
13–5503.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL STUDY HOW THE STATE MAY:
(1) PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE, AFFORDABLE, AND HIGH–QUALITY
PUBLICLY FINANCED HEALTH CARE COVERAGE FOR ALL RESIDENTS OF THE STATE
IN A SEAMLESS AND EQUITABLE MANNER, REGARDLESS OF INCOME, ASSETS,
HEALTH STATUS, CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS, OR AVAILABILITY OF
OTHER HEALTH CARE COVERAGE; AND
(2) INCLUDE A BENEFIT PACKAGE COVERING PRIMARY CARE,
PREVENTIVE CARE, CHRONIC CARE, ACUTE EPISODIC CARE, MENTAL HEALTH CARE,
REPRODUCTIVE CARE, INCLUDING PREGNANCY, BIRTH CONTROL, AND ABORTION
SERVICES, AND HOSPITAL SERVICES.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER HOW TO:
(1) INCORPORATE HEALTH CARE EQUITY;
(2) REDUCE HEALTH CARE DISPARITIES; AND
(3) INCREASE HEALTH CARE ACCESS, PARTICULARLY IN URBAN AND
RURAL SETTINGS WITH LIMITED ACCESS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER PLANS, ANALYSES, PROGRAMS,
AND LEGISLATION IN OTHER STATES.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON
HOW TO CONTAIN COSTS BY:
(1) PROVIDING INCENTIVES TO RESIDENTS TO AVOID PREVENTABLE
HEALTH CONDITIONS AND UNNECESSARY EMERGENCY ROOM VISITS AND PROMOTE
PERSONAL AND PUBLIC HEALTH;

HOUSE BILL 417 5
(2) ESTABLISHING INNOVATIVE PAYMENT MECHANISMS TO HEALTH
CARE PROVIDERS, SUCH AS GLOBAL PAYMENTS; AND
(3) REDUCING UNNECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENDITURES.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON:
(1) FULLY INTEGRATING OR ALIGNING THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, MEDICARE, PRIVATE INSURANCE, AND STATE, COUNTY,
AND MUNICIPAL EMPLOYEES INTO OR WITH A UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM;
(2) TRANSITIONING WORKERS DISPLACED BY CHANGES TO THE
HEALTH CARE SYSTEM;
(3) CREATING AN OPERATING STRUCTURE FOR A UNIVERSAL HEALTH
CARE PROGRAM; AND
(4) WHETHER A UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM COULD
INCLUDE DENTAL, VISION, HEARING, AND LONG–TERM CARE BENEFITS.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP COST PROJECTIONS FOR THE
HEALTH CARE PROGRAM AND RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE AMOUNTS AND
MECHANISMS NECESSARY TO FINANCE A UNIVERSAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM.
(G) (1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT
AN INTERIM REPORT ON ITS ACTIVITIES TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE FINANCE
COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS
COMMITTEE.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL
SUBMIT A FINAL REPORT WITH ITS ANALYSIS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND
GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS COMMITTEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.